Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska49-303
Repeal of statutes; deferred operative date; effect.

When any act of the Legislature provides for a deferred operative date and also contains a repeal section, the action of a subsequent Legislature in postponing or accelerating such operative date whether by reference to the session laws or to the sections of the act as caused to be printed by the Revisor of Statutes shall act as a corresponding postponement or acceleration of the operative date of the repeal section without the necessity of specific reference thereto unless the Legislature specifically and clearly expresses a different intent.

Laws 1979, LB 70, § 3.